Utah statutes.
4-31-5.   Imported dairy cattle -- Tuberculosis certificates.

No person shall bring cattle into this state for dairy or breeding purposes, unless they are certified as having been examined and tested negative for tuberculosis within 30 days before shipment to Utah. The certificate required by this section may be waived if the commissioner determines the cattle are shipped directly to Utah from an area approved by the United States Department of Agriculture as an accredited tuberculosis free area.

